Nebraska statutes.
Revised Statutes Cumulative Supplement, 20268-3032
Controllable Electronic Record Fraud Prevention Act, how cited.

Sections 8-3032 to 8-3042 shall be known and may be cited as the Controllable Electronic Record Fraud Prevention Act.

Laws 2025, LB609, § 1.